District of Columbia statutes.
25-103

Exceptions to license requirement.

(a)

A physician, dentist, veterinarian, or person in charge of an institution regularly conducted as a hospital or sanatorium for the care of persons in ill health, or as a home devoted exclusively to the care of aged people, may administer alcoholic beverages to a patient in their care receiving treatment.

(b)

This title shall not apply to alcohol sold for use in the manufacture and sale of any of the following if they are unfit for beverage purposes:

(1)

Denatured alcohol produced and used pursuant to Acts of Congress and regulations promulgated thereunder;

(2)

Patent, proprietary, medicinal, pharmaceutical, antiseptic, and toilet preparations;

(3)

Flavoring extracts, syrups, and food products; or

(4)

Scientific, chemical, mechanical, and industrial products.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 323, ch. 4, §§ 8, 9
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 102, ch. 159, § 404(b)
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, § 5, 29 DCR 3617
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-192, § 26(b), 33 DCR 7836
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 21(a), 44 DCR 1271
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Section References

This section is referenced in § 48-902.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-103.
1973 Ed., §§ 25-108, 25-109.